District of Columbia statutes.
3-1207.56

Waiver of requirements.

The Board shall waive the educational and examination requirements under § 3-1207.52(b) for any applicant for registration or registration renewal who can demonstrate to the satisfaction of the Board that he or she has been performing the function of a pharmacy technician on a full-time or substantially full-time basis continually for at least 24 months immediately preceding May 1, 2013, and is qualified to do so on the basis of pertinent education, training, experience, and demonstrated current experience; provided, that the application is made within 24 months of May 1, 2013.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 756
as added May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-303, § 2(d), 60 DCR 2711

History

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-303 added this section.

Effect of Amendments